Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1499
Landlord; failure to deliver possession; remedies.

If a landlord fails to deliver physical possession of the mobile home space to the tenant as provided in section 76-1491, rent shall abate until possession is delivered and the tenant may:

(1) Upon written notice to the landlord, terminate the rental agreement and upon termination the landlord shall return all deposits; or

(2) Demand performance of the rental agreement by the landlord and, if the tenant elects, maintain an action for possession of the mobile home space against the landlord and recover the damages sustained by the tenant. If the failure by the landlord to deliver possession of the mobile home space is willful, the tenant may recover reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.

If the landlord delivers physical possession to the tenant but fails to comply with section 76-1492 at the time of delivery, rent shall not abate. The tenant may also proceed with the remedies provided in section 76-1498.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 50.